Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5021
Rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out its constitutional or statutory purposes, powers, or authority. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to regulate persons and proceedings within the commission's jurisdiction and authority.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 291, § 10.